Florida, session 2026, SB346.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âSection 790.301, Florida Statutes, is created to 43 read: 44 790.301âAssault weapons.â 45 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 46 (a)1.ââAssault weaponâ means any selective-fire firearm 47 capable of fully automatic, semiautomatic, or burst fire at the 48 option of the user or any of the following semiautomatic 49 firearms: 50 a.âAll AK series, including, but not limited to, the 51 following: AK, AKM, AKS, AK-47, AK-74, ARM, MAK90, MISR, NHM90, 52 NHM91, SA 85, SA 93, VEPR, WASR-10, WUM, Rock River Arms LAR-47, 53 and Vector Arms AK-47. 54 b.âAll AR series, including, but not limited to, the 55 following: AR-10, AR-15, Bushmaster XM15, Armalite AR-180 and 56 M15, Olympic Arms, AR70, DPMS tactical rifles, Smith & Wesson 57 M&P15 rifles, Colt AR-15, Rock River Arms LAR-15, and DoubleStar 58 AR rifles. 59 c.âAlgimec AGM1. 60 d.âBarrett 82A1 and REC7. 61 e.âBeretta AR-70 and Beretta Storm. 62 f.âBushmaster auto rifle. 63 g.âCalico Liberty series. 64 h.âChartered Industries of Singapore SR-88. 65 i.âColt Sporter. 66 j.âDaewoo K-1, K-2, Max-1, and Max-2. 67 k.âFabrique National FN/FAL, FN/LAR, and FNC. 68 l.âFAMAS MAS 223. 69 m.âFederal XC-900 and SC-450. 70 n.âFNH PS90, SCAR, and FS2000. 71 o.âGoncz High Tech Carbine. 72 p.âHi-Point Carbine. 73 q.âHK-91, HK-93, HK-94, SP-89, or HK-PSG-1. 74 r.âKel-Tec Sub-2000, SU series, RFB. 75 s.âM1 Carbine. 76 t.âSAR-8, SAR-4800, and SR9. 77 u.âSIG 57 AMT and 500 series. 78 v.âSIG Sauer MCX rifle. 79 w.âSKS capable of accepting a detachable magazine. 80 x.âSLG 95. 81 y.âSLR 95 or 96. 82 z.âSpectre Auto carbine. 83 aa.âSpringfield Armory BM59, SAR-48, and G-3. 84 bb.âSterling MK-6 and MK-7. 85 cc.âSteyr AUG. 86 dd.âSturm Ruger Mini-14 with folding stock. 87 ee.âTNW M230 and M2HB. 88 ff.âThompson types, including Thompson T5. 89 gg.âUZI, Galil and UZI Sporter, Galil Sporter, Galil Sniper 90 Rifle (Galatz), or Vector Arms UZI. 91 hh.âWeaver Arms Nighthawk. 92 2.âAll of the following handguns, or copies, duplicates, or 93 altered facsimiles thereof with the capability of any such 94 weapon: 95 a.âAK-47 pistol and Mini AK-47 pistol. 96 b.âAR-15 pistol. 97 c.âAustralian Automatic Arms SAP pistol. 98 d.âBushmaster Auto pistol. 99 e.âCalico Liberty series pistols. 100 f.âEncom MK-IV, MP-9, and MP-45. 101 g.âFeather AT-9 and Mini-AT. 102 h.âGoncz High Tech Long pistol. 103 i.âHolmes MP-83. 104 j.âIver Johnson Enforcer. 105 k.âMAC-10, MAC-11, Masterpiece Arms MPA pistol series, and 106 Velocity Arms VMA series. 107 l.âIntratec TEC-9, TEC-DC9, TEC-22 Scorpion, or AB-10. 108 m.âUZI pistol and Micro-UZI pistol. 109 n.âColefire Magnum. 110 o.âScarab Skorpion. 111 p.âSpectre Auto pistol. 112 q.âGerman Sport 522 PK. 113 r.âChiappa Firearms Mfour-22. 114 s.âDSA SA58 PKP FAL. 115 t.âI.O. Inc. PPS-43C. 116 u.âKel-Tec PLR-16 pistol. 117 v.âSIG Sauer P556 pistol. 118 w.âThompson TA5 series pistols. 119 x.âWilkinson âLindaâ pistol. 120 3.âAll of the following shotguns, or copies, duplicates, or 121 altered facsimiles thereof with the capability of any such 122 weapon: 123 a.âArmscor 30 BG. 124 b.âFranchi SPAS-12 and Law-12. 125 c.âRemington TAC-2 or TACB3 FS. 126 d.âSPAS 12 or LAW 12. 127 e.âStriker 12. 128 f.âStreetsweeper. 129 g.âSaiga. 130 h.âUSAS-12. 131 i.âKel-Tec KSG. 132 4.âA part or combination of parts which converts a firearm 133 into an assault weapon, or any combination of parts from which 134 an assault weapon may be assembled if those parts are in the 135 possession or under the control of the same person. 136 5.âAny semiautomatic firearm not listed in subparagraphs 137 1.-4. which meets any of the following criteria: 138 a.âA semiautomatic rifle that has an ability to accept a 139 detachable magazine and has one or more of the following: 140 (I)âA folding or telescoping stock; 141 (II)âA pistol grip, a thumbhole stock or Thordsen-type grip 142 or stock, or any other characteristic that can function as a 143 grip; 144 (III)âA bayonet mount; 145 (IV)âA flash suppressor or threaded barrel designed to 146 accommodate a flash suppressor; 147 (V)âA grenade launcher; or 148 (VI)âA shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially or 149 completely encircles the barrel, allowing the shooter to hold 150 the firearm with the non-trigger hand without being burned, but 151 excluding a slide that encloses the barrel. 152 b.âA semiautomatic pistol that has the ability to accept a 153 detachable magazine and has one or more of the following: 154 (I)âThe capacity to accept a large-capacity magazine that 155 attaches to the pistol at any location outside of the pistol 156 grip; 157 (II)âA threaded barrel capable of accepting a barrel 158 extender, flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer; 159 (III)âA slide that encloses the barrel and allows the 160 shooter to hold the firearm with the non-trigger hand without 161 being burned; 162 (IV)âA manufactured weight of 50 ounces or more when the 163 pistol is unloaded; 164 (V)âA semiautomatic version of an automatic firearm; 165 (VI)âAny feature capable of functioning as a protruding 166 grip that can be held by the non-trigger hand; or 167 (VII)âA folding, telescoping, or thumbhole stock. 168 c.âA semiautomatic shotgun that has one or more of the 169 following: 170 (I)âA folding or telescoping stock; 171 (II)âA pistol grip, a thumbhole stock or Thordsen-type grip 172 or stock, or any other characteristic that can function as a 173 grip; 174 (III)âA thumbhole stock; 175 (IV)âA fixed magazine capacity in excess of 5 rounds; or 176 (V)âThe ability to accept a detachable magazine. 177 d.âAny semiautomatic pistol or any semiautomatic, 178 centerfire, or rimfire rifle with a fixed magazine that has the 179 capacity to accept more than 10 rounds of ammunition. 180 e.âA part or combination of parts designed or intended to 181 convert a firearm into an assault weapon, or any combination of 182 parts from which an assault weapon may be assembled if those 183 parts are in the possession or under the control of the same 184 person. 185 (b)ââDetachable magazineâ means an ammunition feeding 186 device that can be removed from a firearm without disassembly of 187 the firearm action. 188 (c)ââFixed magazineâ means an ammunition feeding device 189 contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such a 190 manner that the device cannot be removed without disassembly of 191 the firearm action. 192 (d)ââLarge-capacity magazineâ means an ammunition feeding 193 device with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds, or any 194 conversion kit, part, or combination of parts from which such a 195 device can be assembled if those parts are in the possession or 196 under the control of the same person, but does not include any 197 of the following: 198 1.âA feeding device that has been permanently altered so 199 that it cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds; 200 2.âA .22 caliber tube ammunition feeding device; or 201 3.âA tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action 202 firearm. 203 (e)ââLicensed gun dealerâ means a person who has a federal 204 firearms license. 205 (2)âSALE OR TRANSFER.â 206 (a)âA person who, within this state, distributes, 207 transports, or imports into this state; who sells, keeps for 208 sale, or offers or exposes for sale; or who gives an assault 209 weapon or a large-capacity magazine in violation of this 210 section, except as provided in paragraph (c), commits a felony 211 of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 212 775.083, or s. 775.084, with a mandatory minimum term of 213 imprisonment of 2 years. 214 (b)âA person who transfers, sells, or gives an assault 215 weapon or a large-capacity magazine to a person under 18 years 216 of age in violation of this section commits a felony of the 217 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 218 or s. 775.084, with a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 219 6 years. 220 (c)âParagraph (a) does not apply to: 221 1.âThe sale of assault weapons or large-capacity magazines 222 to the Department of Law Enforcement, a law enforcement agency 223 as defined in s. 934.02, the Department of Corrections, or the 224 military or naval forces of this state or of the United States 225 for use in the discharge of their official duties. 226 2.âA person who is the executor or administrator of an 227 estate that includes an assault weapon or a large-capacity 228 magazine for which a certificate of possession has been issued 229 under subsection (4) and which is disposed of as authorized by 230 the probate court, if the disposition is otherwise permitted 231 under this section. 232 3.âThe transfer by bequest or intestate succession of an 233 assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine for which a 234 certificate of possession has been issued under subsection (4). 235 (3)âPOSSESSION.â 236 (a)âExcept as provided in subsection (5), a person who, 237 within this state, possesses any assault weapon or large 238 capacity magazine, except as provided in this section or as 239 otherwise authorized by law, commits a felony of the third 240 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 241 775.084, with a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 1 242 year. 243 (b)âParagraph (a) does not apply to the possession of 244 assault weapons or large-capacity magazines by members or 245 employees of the Department of Law Enforcement, a law 246 enforcement agency as defined in s. 934.02, the Department of 247 Corrections, or the military or naval forces of this state or of 248 the United States for use in the discharge of their official 249 duties; and this section does not prohibit the possession or use 250 of assault weapons or large-capacity magazines by sworn members 251 of such agencies when on duty and when the use is within the 252 scope of their duties. 253 (c)âParagraph (a) does not apply to the possession of an 254 assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine by a person before 255 July 1, 2027, if all of the following are applicable: 256 1.âThe person is eligible to apply for a certificate of 257 possession under subsection (4) for the assault weapon or large 258 capacity magazine by July 1, 2027. 259 2.âThe person lawfully possessed the assault weapon or 260 large-capacity magazine before October 1, 2026. 261 3.âThe person is otherwise in compliance with this section 262 and the applicable requirements of this chapter for possession 263 of a firearm. 264 (d)âParagraph (a) does not apply to a person who is the 265 executor or administrator of an estate that includes an assault 266 weapon or a large-capacity magazine for which a certificate of 267 possession has been issued under subsection (4), if the assault 268 weapon or large-capacity magazine is possessed at a place set 269 forth in subparagraph (4)(d)1. or as authorized by the probate 270 court. 271 (4)âCERTIFICATE OF POSSESSION.â 272 (a)âA person who lawfully possesses an assault weapon or a 273 large-capacity magazine before October 1, 2026, must apply by 274 October 1, 2027, or, if such person is a member of the military 275 or naval forces of this state or of the United States and is 276 unable to apply by October 1, 2027, because he or she is or was 277 on official duty outside of this state, must apply within 90 278 days after returning to this state, to the Department of Law 279 Enforcement for a certificate of possession with respect to such 280 assault weapon or large-capacity magazine. The certificate must 281 contain a description of the assault weapon or large-capacity 282 magazine which identifies it uniquely, including all 283 identification marks; the full name, address, date of birth, and 284 thumbprint of the owner; and any other information as the 285 department may deem appropriate. The department shall adopt 286 rules no later than January 1, 2027, to establish procedures 287 with respect to the application for, and issuance of, 288 certificates of possession pursuant to this subsection. The 289 thumbprint of the applicant must be taken by a law enforcement 290 agency or the Department of Law Enforcement together with any 291 personal identifying information required by federal law to 292 process fingerprints. Charges for thumbprint services under this 293 paragraph are not subject to the sales tax on fingerprint 294 services imposed in s. 212.05(1)(i). The Department of Law 295 Enforcement shall conduct a background investigation pursuant to 296 this subsection. 297 (b)âA certificate of possession issued under this 298 subsection must be in substantially the following form: 299 300 CERTIFICATE OF POSSESSION OF ASSAULT WEAPON 301 Certificate Number: 302 Ownerâs Name: (last, first, middle) 303 Address (NO P.O. Boxes): (number, street, city or town, 304 state, zip code) 305 Date of Birth: 306 Social Security Number (optional, but will help prevent 307 misidentification): 308 Driver License Number and State: 309 Manufacturer: 310 Importer: 311 Serial Number: 312 Model: 313 Caliber: 314 Unique I.D./Markings: 315 Signature of Owner: 316 Applicantâs Right Thumbprint: 317 318 (c)âAn assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine 319 possessed pursuant to this section may not be sold or 320 transferred on or after January 1, 2027, to a person within this 321 state other than to a licensed gun dealer, as provided in 322 subsection (5), or by a bequest or intestate succession. A 323 person who obtains title to an assault weapon or a large 324 capacity magazine for which a certificate of possession has been 325 issued under this subsection by bequest or intestate succession 326 must, within 90 days after obtaining title, apply to the 327 Department of Law Enforcement for a certificate of possession as 328 provided in this subsection, render the assault weapon or large 329 capacity magazine permanently inoperable, sell the weapon or 330 large-capacity magazine to a licensed gun dealer, or remove the 331 weapon or large-capacity magazine from this state. A person who 332 moves into this state and is in lawful possession of an assault 333 weapon or a large-capacity magazine must, within 90 days, either 334 render the weapon or large-capacity magazine permanently 335 inoperable, sell the weapon or large-capacity magazine to a 336 licensed gun dealer, or remove the weapon or large-capacity 337 magazine from this state. This paragraph does not apply to a 338 person who is a member of the military or naval forces of this 339 state or of the United States, who is in lawful possession of an 340 assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine, and who has been 341 transferred into this state after October 1, 2027. 342 (d)âA person issued a certificate of possession for an 343 assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine under this 344 subsection may possess it only under the following conditions: 345 1.âAt that personâs residence, place of business, or other 346 property owned by that person, or on property owned by another 347 person with the ownerâs express permission; 348 2.âWhile on the premises of a target range of a public or 349 private club or organization organized for the purpose of 350 practicing shooting at targets; 351 3.âWhile on a target range that holds a regulatory or 352 business license for the purpose of practicing shooting at that 353 target range; 354 4.âWhile on the premises of a licensed shooting club; 355 5.âWhile attending any exhibition, display, or educational 356 program that is about firearms and is sponsored by, conducted 357 under the auspices of, or approved by a law enforcement agency 358 or a nationally or state-recognized entity that fosters 359 proficiency in, or promotes education about, firearms; or 360 6.âWhile transporting the assault weapon or large-capacity 361 magazine between any of the places mentioned in this paragraph, 362 or to any licensed gun dealer for servicing or repair pursuant 363 to paragraph (7)(b), provided the assault weapon or large 364 capacity magazine is transported as required by subsection (7). 365 (e)âIf an applicant for a certificate of possession under 366 this subsection fails to qualify for the certificate after the 367 background investigation required under this subsection, the 368 applicant must arrange to relinquish all assault weapons or 369 large-capacity magazines in his or her possession as provided in 370 subsection (6) within 10 days after he or she receives written 371 notice from the Department of Law Enforcement of failure to 372 qualify for the certificate. Such applicant who fails to make 373 such an arrangement within the time specified in this paragraph 374 is thereafter in violation of this section. 375 (5)âCERTIFICATE OF TRANSFER.âIf an owner of an assault 376 weapon or a large-capacity magazine sells or transfers the 377 weapon or magazine to a licensed gun dealer, the owner must, at 378 the time of delivery of the weapon, execute a certificate of 379 transfer and cause the certificate to be mailed or delivered to 380 the Department of Law Enforcement. The certificate must contain 381 all of the following: 382 (a)âThe date of sale or transfer. 383 (b)âThe names and addresses of the seller or transferor and 384 the licensed gun dealer and their social security numbers or 385 driver license numbers. 386 (c)âThe licensed gun dealerâs federal firearms license 387 number. 388 (d)âA description of the weapon, including the caliber of 389 the weapon and its make, model, and serial number. 390 (e)âAny other information the Department of Law Enforcement 391 prescribes. 392 393 The licensed gun dealer shall present his or her driver license 394 or social security card and federal firearms license to the 395 seller or transferor for inspection at the time of purchase or 396 transfer. The Department of Law Enforcement shall maintain at 397 its headquarters a file of all certificates of transfer. 398 (6)âRELINQUISHMENT.âAn individual may arrange in advance to 399 relinquish an assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine to a 400 law enforcement agency as defined in s. 934.02 or to the 401 Department of Law Enforcement. The assault weapon or large 402 capacity magazine must be transported in accordance with 403 subsection (7). 404 (7)âTRANSPORTATION.â 405 (a)âA licensed gun dealer who lawfully purchases for resale 406 outside this state an assault weapon or a large-capacity 407 magazine pursuant to subsection (2) may transport the assault 408 weapon or large-capacity magazine between dealers or outside 409 this state, but a person may not carry a loaded assault weapon 410 concealed from public view or knowingly have in any motor 411 vehicle owned, operated, or occupied by him or her a loaded 412 assault weapon or an unloaded assault weapon, unless such weapon 413 is kept in the trunk of such vehicle or in a case or other 414 container that is inaccessible to the operator of or any 415 passenger in such vehicle. A person who violates this subsection 416 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 417 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. Any licensed gun dealer 418 may display the assault weapon or large-capacity magazine at any 419 gun show or sell it to a buyer outside this state. 420 (b)âAny licensed gun dealer may transfer possession of any 421 assault weapon or large-capacity magazine received pursuant to 422 paragraph (a) to a gunsmith for purposes of accomplishing 423 service or repair of the same. Transfers are permissible only to 424 the following persons: 425 1.âA gunsmith in the dealerâs employ; or 426 2.âA gunsmith with whom the dealer has contracted for 427 gunsmithing services, provided that the gunsmith receiving the 428 assault weapon holds a dealerâs license issued pursuant to 429 chapter 44 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 18 U.S.C. ss. 430 921 et seq., and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. 431 (8)âCIRCUMSTANCES IN WHICH MANUFACTURE OR TRANSPORTATION IS 432 NOT PROHIBITED.âThis section does not prohibit any person, firm, 433 or corporation engaged in the business of manufacturing assault 434 weapons or large-capacity magazines in this state from 435 manufacturing or transporting assault weapons or large-capacity 436 magazines in this state for sale within this state in accordance 437 with subparagraph (2)(c)1. or for sale outside this state. 438 (9)âEXCEPTION.âThis section does not apply to any firearm 439 modified to render it permanently inoperable. 440 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 441 775.087, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 442 775.087âPossession or use of weapon; aggravated battery; 443 felony reclassification; minimum sentence.â 444 (3)(a)1.âAny person who is convicted of a felony or an 445 attempt to commit a felony, regardless of whether the use of a 446 firearm is an element of the felony, and the conviction was for: 447 a.âMurder; 448 b.âSexual battery; 449 c.âRobbery; 450 d.âBurglary; 451 e.âArson; 452 f.âAggravated battery; 453 g.âKidnapping; 454 h.âEscape; 455 i.âSale, manufacture, delivery, or intent to sell, 456 manufacture, or deliver any controlled substance; 457 j.âAircraft piracy; 458 k.âAggravated child abuse; 459 l.âAggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult; 460 m.âUnlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a 461 destructive device or bomb; 462 n.âCarjacking; 463 o.âHome-invasion robbery; 464 p.âAggravated stalking; 465 q.âTrafficking in cannabis, trafficking in cocaine, capital 466 importation of cocaine, trafficking in illegal drugs, capital 467 importation of illegal drugs, trafficking in phencyclidine, 468 capital importation of phencyclidine, trafficking in 469 methaqualone, capital importation of methaqualone, trafficking 470 in amphetamine, capital importation of amphetamine, trafficking 471 in flunitrazepam, trafficking in gamma-hydroxybutyric acid 472 (GHB), trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol, trafficking in 473 Phenethylamines, or other violation of s. 893.135(1); or 474 r.âHuman trafficking, 475 476 and during the commission of the offense, such person possessed 477 a semiautomatic firearm and its high-capacity detachable box 478 magazine, an assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine as 479 those terms are defined in s. 790.301, or a machine gun as 480 defined in s. 790.001, shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 481 imprisonment of 15 years. 482 2.âAny person who is convicted of a felony or an attempt to 483 commit a felony listed in subparagraph 1., regardless of whether 484 the use of a weapon is an element of the felony, and during the 485 course of the commission of the felony such person discharged a 486 semiautomatic firearm and its high-capacity box magazine, an 487 assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine as those terms are 488 defined in s. 790.301, or a âmachine gunâ as defined in s. 489 790.001, shall be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of 490 20 years. 491 3.âAny person who is convicted of a felony or an attempt to 492 commit a felony listed in subparagraph 1., regardless of whether 493 the use of a weapon is an element of the felony, and during the 494 course of the commission of the felony such person discharged a 495 semiautomatic firearm and its high-capacity box magazine, an 496 assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine as those terms are 497 defined in s. 790.301, or a âmachine gunâ as defined in s. 498 790.001 and, as the result of the discharge, death or great 499 bodily harm was inflicted upon any person, the convicted person 500 shall be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of not less 501 than 25 years and not more than a term of imprisonment of life 502 in prison. 503 Section 3.âIf any provision of this act or its application 504 to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity 505 does not affect other provisions or applications of the act 506 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or 507 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are 508 severable. 509 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.